Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1206
Reorganization of educational service unit boundaries; legislative intent.

The Legislature finds that from time to time there is a need to change the boundaries of educational service units in response to changes in student population and in student and school needs as well as changes in the taxable wealth and financial resources of the educational service units. It is the intent of the Legislature to establish an orderly process for locally initiated reorganization of educational service unit boundaries. The purpose of sections 79-1206 to 79-1211 is to establish the statutory framework for such process and to empower the State Board of Education to make changes in educational service unit boundaries based on statutory criteria.

Laws 1987, LB 688, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2202.03;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 923.